Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-4404.01
Sharing of information; authorized; rules and regulations.

(1) The Department of Economic Development and the Department of Revenue may share information, including information of a confidential nature, as needed to properly administer the Good Life Transformational Projects Act.

(2) The Department of Economic Development may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Good Life Transformational Projects Act.

Laws 2025, LB707, § 7.